Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-214 Miscellaneous provisions. (a)
Nothing in this part shall be construed to reduce the liability for unpaid
assessments of the insureds of an impaired or insolvent insurer operating under
a plan with assessment liability.

(b) Records shall be kept of all meetings of
the board of directors to discuss the activities of the association in carrying
out its powers and duties under section 431:16-208. The records of the
association with respect to an impaired or insolvent insurer shall not be disclosed
prior to the termination of a liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation
proceeding involving the impaired or insolvent insurer, except:

(1) Upon the termination of the impairment or
insolvency of the insurer; or

(2) Upon the order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.

Nothing in this subsection shall limit the duty of
the association to render a report of its activities under section 431:2-304(b).

(c) For the purpose of carrying out its
obligations under this part, the association shall be deemed to be a creditor
of the impaired or insolvent insurer to the extent of assets attributable to
covered policies reduced by any amounts to which the association is entitled as
subrogee pursuant to section 431:16-208(j). Assets of the impaired or
insolvent insurer attributable to covered policies shall be used to continue
all covered policies and pay all contractual obligations of the impaired or
insolvent insurer as required by this part. Assets attributable to covered
policies, as used in this subsection, are that proportion of the assets which
the reserves that should have been established for such policies bear to the
reserves that should have been established for all policies of insurance
written by the impaired or insolvent insurer.

(d) As a creditor of the impaired or insolvent
insurer as established in subsection (c) and consistent with section
431:15-324, the association and other similar associations shall be entitled to
receive a disbursement of assets out of the marshaled assets, from time to time
as the assets become available to reimburse it, as a credit against contractual
obligations under this part. If the liquidator has not, within one hundred
twenty days of a final determination of insolvency of an insurer by the
receivership court, made an application to the court for the approval of a
proposal to disburse assets out of marshaled assets to guaranty associations
having obligations because of the insolvency, the association shall be entitled
to make application to the receivership court for approval of its own proposal
to disburse these assets.

(e)(1) Prior to the termination of any liquidation,
rehabilitation, or conservation proceeding, the court may take into
consideration the contributions of the respective parties, including the
association, the shareholders, and policy owners of the insolvent insurer, and
any other party with a bona fide interest, in making an equitable distribution
of the ownership rights of such insolvent insurer. In such a determination consideration
shall be given to the welfare of the policyholders of the continuing or
successor insurer.

(2) No distribution to stockholders, if any, of an
impaired or insolvent insurer shall be made until and unless the total amount
of valid claims of the association with interest thereon for funds expended in
carrying out its powers and duties under section 431:16-208
with respect to such insurer have been fully recovered by the association.

(f)(1) If an order for liquidation or rehabilitation of
an insurer domiciled in this State has been entered, the receiver appointed
under such order shall have a right to recover on behalf of the insurer, from
any affiliate that controlled it, the amount of distributions, other than stock
dividends paid by the insurer on its capital stock, made at any time during the
five years preceding the petition for liquidation or rehabilitation subject to
the limitations of paragraphs (2) to (4).

(2) No such distribution shall be recoverable if the
insurer shows that when paid the distribution was lawful and reasonable, and
that the insurer did not know and could not reasonably have known that the
distribution might adversely affect the ability of the insurer to fulfill its
contractual obligations.

(3) Any person who was an affiliate that controlled
the insurer at the time the distributions were paid shall be liable up to the
amount of distributions the person received. Any person who was an affiliate
that controlled the insurer at the time the distributions were declared, shall
be liable up to the amount of distributions the person would have received if
they had been paid immediately. If two or more persons are liable with respect
to the same distributions, they shall be jointly and severally liable.

(4) The maximum amount recoverable under this
subsection shall be the amount needed in excess of all other available assets
of the insolvent insurer to pay the contractual obligations of the insolvent
insurer.

(5) If any person liable under paragraph (3) is
insolvent, all its affiliates that controlled it at the time the distribution
was paid, shall be jointly and severally liable for any resulting deficiency in
the amount recovered from the insolvent affiliate. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am
L 1989, c 195, §39; am L 2012, c 250, §11]

Note

The 2012 amendment shall not apply to any proceedings in
which a member insurer is placed under an order of liquidation prior to July 1,
2012. L 2012, c 250, §15.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next